Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.785

Money-purchase retirement savings principal and administrative accounts created—Participation in money-purchase retirement savings plans—Department's duties.

(1) The money-purchase retirement savings principal account is hereby created in the state treasury.

(2) The amount of compensation deferred under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a) by employees under agreements entered into under the authority contained in RCW 41.50.770 shall be paid into the money-purchase retirement savings principal account and shall be sufficient to cover costs of administration and staffing in addition to such other amounts as determined by the department. The money-purchase retirement savings principal account shall be used to carry out the purposes of RCW 41.50.770. All eligible state employees shall be given the opportunity to participate in agreements entered into by the department under RCW 41.50.770. State agencies shall cooperate with the department in providing employees with the opportunity to participate.

(3) Any county, municipality, or other subdivision of the state may elect to participate in any agreements entered into by the department under RCW 41.50.770, including the making of payments therefrom to the employees participating in a 26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a) plan upon their separation from state or other qualifying service. Accordingly, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account shall be considered to be a public pension or retirement fund within the meaning of Article XXIX, section 1 of the state Constitution, for the purpose of determining eligible investments and deposits of the moneys therein.

(4) All moneys in the state money-purchase retirement savings principal account and the state money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, all property and rights purchased therewith, and all income attributable thereto, shall be held in trust by the state investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for the exclusive benefit of the state 26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a) plan's participants and their beneficiaries. Neither the participant, nor the participant's beneficiary or beneficiaries, nor any other designee, has any right to commute, sell, assign, transfer, or otherwise convey the right to receive any payments under the plan. These payments and right thereto are nonassignable and nontransferable. Unpaid accumulated deferrals are not subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution and are not transferable by operation of law in event of bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the extent otherwise required by law.

(5) The state investment board has the full power to invest moneys in the state money-purchase retirement savings principal account and the state money-purchase retirement savings administrative account in accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and 41.50.770, and cumulative investment directions received pursuant to RCW 41.50.770. All investment and operating costs of the state investment board associated with the investment of the money-purchase retirement savings plan assets shall be paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, one hundred percent of all earnings from these investments shall accrue directly to the money-purchase retirement savings principal account.

(6)(a) No state board or commission, agency, or any officer, employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from participant investments selected pursuant to *RCW 41.50.770(5).

(b) Neither the department, nor the director or any employee, nor the state investment board, nor any officer, employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from reasonable efforts to implement investment directions pursuant to *RCW 41.50.770(5).

(7) The money-purchase retirement savings administrative account is hereby created in the state treasury. All expenses of the department pertaining to the money-purchase retirement savings plan including staffing and administrative expenses shall be paid out of the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account. Any excess balances credited to this account over administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be transferred to the money-purchase retirement savings principal account at such time and in such amounts as may be determined by the department with the approval of the office of financial management. Any deficiency in the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account caused by an excess of administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be transferred to this account from the money-purchase retirement savings principal account.

(8)(a)(i) The department shall keep or cause to be kept full and adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs of any deferred compensation plans created under RCW 41.50.770 and this section. The department shall account for and report on the investment of state money-purchase retirement savings plan assets or may enter into an agreement with the state investment board for such accounting and reporting.

(ii) The department's duties related to individual participant accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction, settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.

(iii) The department has sole responsibility for contracting with any recordkeepers for individual participant accounts and shall manage the performance of recordkeepers under those contracts.

(b)(i) The department's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its responsibilities for asset management and balancing of the money-purchase retirement savings funds.

(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment management for the money-purchase retirement savings funds and shall manage the performance of investment managers under those contracts.

(c) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of engagement for the custodial banks.

(9) The department may adopt rules necessary to carry out its responsibilities under RCW 41.50.770 and this section.

[ 2016 c 112 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.50.770 was amended by 2022 c 72 s 1, changing subsection (5) to subsection (6).